Hawaii, session 2025, HB418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  (a)  There is established a working group to revise the State's qualified allocation plan, the prioritization of the rental housing revolving fund, and the terms of loans made from the fund. (b) The working group shall make recommendations to revise: (1)  The State's qualified allocation plan to more effectively allocate federal and state low-income housing tax credits to projects that best meet the housing needs of the State; and (2)  The prioritization of the rental housing revolving fund and the terms of loans made from the fund to support low-income rental housing project and mixed-income rental projects. (c)  The working group shall consist of the following members: (1)  The executive director of the Hawaii housing finance and development corporation, or the executive director's designee, who shall serve as the chairperson of the working group; (2)  The executive director of the Hawaii public housing authority, or the executive director's designee; (3)  The chairpersons of the senate and house of representatives standing committees on housing, or their designees; and (4)  Relevant stakeholders, as recommended by the members of the working group, who shall be invited by the working group's chairperson. (d)  The working group shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. (e)  The members of the working group shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (f) No member of the working group shall be subject to chapter 84, Hawaii Revised Statutes, solely because of the member's participation in the working group. (g)  The working group shall be dissolved on June 30, 2026. SECTION 2. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________